Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-2101
Act, how cited.

Sections 68-2101 to 68-2109 shall be known and may be cited as the Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Act.

Laws 2024, LB1087, § 1.